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DTC 23 Both Fuel Pump Simultaneous Operation
Malfunction (*)

*: Fuel Tank Changeover Switch OFF

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Item Trouble Area

23

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is low)
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is high
(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is high

SShort insub fuel tank forcingdriving relaycircuit
SSub fuel tank forcingdriving relay
SShort insub fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 38.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckvoltagebetweenterminalFPMRofengineECUconnectorandbody
ground (See page DI−1 46, step 2).

OK Repair and replace harness and connector.

NG

2 Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI−58).

NGReplace subfuel tankforcingdrivingrelay.

OK
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3 Check voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU con-
nectorandbodyground,and turn the ignitionswitchONafter
4 seconds.
OK:

Voltage:9 − 14 V

NG Go to step 4.

OK

Check and repair harness and connector between sub fuel pump and sub fuel tank forcing driv-
ing relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN−1 9) .

4 Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


